Montana, session 2025, SB68.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 5-5-214, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-5-214. Interim activity. (1) The interim committees shall perform their functions when the
legislature is not in session. The personnel, data, and facilities of the legislative services division and other
appropriate legislative entities must be made available to the interim committees.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(b), a committee, council, commission, task force, work
group, or other entity that is created by the legislature to study policy issues and make recommendations to the
legislature and for which the legislative services division provides staff assistance may not perform its functions
when the legislature is in session.
(b) The provisions of subsection (2)(a) do not apply to the legislative council, legislative finance
committee, legislative audit committee, or an entity created as authorized by legislative rules."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 68